Illinois, session 104th, SB510.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Grant Accountability and Transparency Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 708/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Grant 8Accountability and Transparency Act.9(Source: P.A. 98-706, eff. 7-16-14.)